Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Chapter 29. Environmental Protection Council
[Repealed]

§§ 49-29-1 through 49-29-11.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1993, ch. 516, § 10, eff from and after June 30, 1993.

§49-29-1. [En Laws, 1981, ch. 544, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 544, § 8; En Laws, 1988, ch. 594, § 1; Am Laws, 1989, ch. 333, § 1]

§49-29-3. [En Laws, 1981, ch. 544, § 2; repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 544, § 8; En Laws, 1988, ch. 594, § 2]

§49-29-5. [En Laws, 1981, ch. 544, § 3; repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 544, § 8; En Laws, 1988, ch. 594, § 3]

§49-29-7. [En Laws, 1981, ch. 544, § 4; repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 544, § 8; En Laws, 1988, ch. 594, § 4; Laws, 1989, ch. 476, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 506, § 4]

§49-29-9. [En Laws, 1981, ch. 544, § 5; repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 544, § 8; En Laws, 1988, ch. 594, § 5]

§49-29-11. [Laws, 1989, ch. 333, § 2; Am Laws, 1991, ch. 398, § 1]